Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1706.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 128.5 of Title 60, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. As used in this section:


1. “Data center” means a facility whose primary services are


the storage, management, and processing of digital data and that is


used to house:


a. computer and network systems, including associated


components such as servers, network equipment and

Req. No. 2838 Page 1


appliances, and telecommunications and data storage


systems,


b. systems for monitoring and managing infrastructure


performance,


c. equipment used for the transformation, transmission,


distribution, or management of at least one (1)


megawatt of capacity of electrical power and cooling,


including substations, uninterruptible power supply


systems, all electrical plant equipment, and


associated air handlers,


d. Internet-related equipment and services,


e. data communications connections,


f. environmental controls,


g. fire protection systems, and


h. security systems and services;


2. “Foreign adversary” means any country designated by the


United States Secretary of State as hostile or a Country of


Particular Concern (CPC); and


3. “Foreign principal” means:


a. the government or any official of the government of a


foreign adversary,


b. a political party or member of a political party or


any subdivision of a political party of a foreign


adversary,

Req. No. 2838 Page 2


c. a partnership, association, corporation, organization,


or other combination of persons organized under the


laws of or having its principal place of business in a


foreign adversary, or a subsidiary of such entity, or


owned or controlled wholly or in part by any person,


entity, or collection of persons or entities of a


foreign adversary,


d. any person who is domiciled in a foreign adversary and


is not a citizen or lawful permanent resident of the


United States, or


e. any person, entity, or collection of persons or


entities described in subparagraphs a through d of


this paragraph having a controlling interest in a


partnership, association, corporation, organization,


trust, or any other legal entity or subsidiary formed


for the purpose of owning real property.


B. A foreign principal from a foreign adversary may not


directly or indirectly rent or lease or otherwise hold a controlling


interest in a data center, as defined in subsection A of this


section, in this state.


C. A foreign principal that directly or indirectly rents or


leases a data center, as defined in subsection A of this section, in


this state shall divest itself of any rental agreement, lease



Req. No. 2838 Page 3


agreement, or controlling interest in the data center within one


hundred eighty (180) days of the effective date of this act.


D. Any current rental agreements, lease agreements, or other


legal agreements in conflict with the provisions of this act shall


be deemed invalid from the date of adoption unless otherwise


provided.


E. The responsibility for determining whether an entity is


subject to the provisions of this section rests solely with the


foreign entity, the Attorney General, and no other individual or


entity. An individual or entity who is not a foreign entity shall


not be required to determine or inquire whether another person or


entity is or may be subject to this section, and shall bear no civil


or criminal liability under the provisions of this section.


F. If a foreign principal from a foreign adversary does not


divest the real property as required by this section, the Attorney


General shall commence an action in district court within the


jurisdiction of the real property.


G. If a data center is held in violation of the provisions of


this section, the district court shall order the foreign principal


to divest itself of any rental agreement, lease agreement, or


controlling interest in the data center.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-2838 BLB 1/14/2026 10:42:40 AM

Req. No. 2838 Page 4